Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.492

[Art. 58] Execution of confinement.

(1) A sentence of confinement adjudged by a military court, whether or not the sentence includes discharge or dismissal, and whether or not the discharge or dismissal has been executed, may be carried into execution by confinement in any place of confinement under the control of any of the forces of the organized militia or in any jail, penitentiary, or prison designated for that purpose. Persons so confined in a jail, penitentiary, or prison are subject to the same discipline and treatment as persons confined or committed to the jail, penitentiary, or prison by the courts of the state or of any political subdivision thereof.

(2) The omission of the words "hard labor" from any sentence or punishment of a court-martial adjudging confinement does not deprive the authority executing that sentence or punishment of the power to require hard labor as a part of the punishment.

(3) The keepers, officers, and wardens of city or county jails and of other jails, penitentiaries, or prisons designated by the governor, or by such person as the governor may authorize to act under RCW 38.38.080, shall receive persons ordered into confinement before trial and persons committed to confinement by a military court and shall confine them according to law. No such keeper, officer, or warden may require payment of any fee or charge for so receiving or confining a person.

[ 1989 c 48 s 53; 1963 c 220 s 60.]